Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,124.06
Remedial action plan; certificate of completion; immunity.

Upon issuance of a certificate of completion under section 81-15,124.05, except as otherwise provided in such section, the responsible person shall no longer have liability to the state as to the release of petroleum products for which compliance with the remedial action plan is demonstrated by the responsible person.

Laws 2001, LB 461, § 14.